Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-203
Conspiracy; renunciation of criminal intent.

In a prosecution for criminal conspiracy, it shall be an affirmative defense that the defendant, under circumstances manifesting a voluntary and complete renunciation of his criminal intent, gave timely warning to law enforcement authorities or otherwise made a reasonable effort to prevent the conduct or result which is the object of the conspiracy.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 12.